Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201015-1203
City clerk; duties.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the city clerk, on payment to him or her of the costs of the transcript,
shall transmit within fifteen days to the clerk of the district court the
docket fee and a certified and complete transcript of the proceedings of the
city relating to the order or decision appealed. After receipt of such fee
and transcript, the clerk of the district court shall docket the appeal.

(2) If the appellant
files an affidavit alleging that he or she is indigent pursuant to section
15-1202, the city clerk shall transmit within fifteen days to the clerk of
the district court a certified and complete transcript of the proceedings
of the city relating to the order or decision appealed. After receipt of the
transcript, the clerk of the district court shall docket the appeal.

Laws 1969, c. 65, § 3, p. 378;

Laws 1983, LB 52, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB441, § 3.